California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) If a suit for bodily injury has been filed against an uninsured motorist in a court of competent jurisdiction, notice in writing of the suit shall be provided the insurer of the insured plaintiff within a reasonable time after the insured knew or should have known of the uninsured status of the motorist, but in no event shall that notice be required before two years from the date of the accrual of the cause of action on which the claim is based. Failure of the insured or his or her representative to give notice shall not be a basis for denial of the uninsured motorist benefits in the absence of proof of prejudice by the insurer.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds that this section is declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the Legislature to abrogate the holdings in cases such as State Farm Mutual Auto. Ins. Co. v. Patton, 194 Cal. App. 3d 626, to the extent that they are inconsistent with this section. Those decisions are abrogated and shall not apply to any matters not final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 56, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.24.

(a) A private passenger motor vehicle insured by its owner pursuant to a policy of insurance subject to Section 11580.1 or 11580.2 shall not be classified as a commercial vehicle, for-hire vehicle, permissive use vehicle, or livery solely because its owner allows it to be used for personal vehicle sharing as long as all of the following circumstances apply:

(1) The personal vehicle sharing is conducted pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program.

(2) The annual revenue received by the vehicle’s owner
 that was generated by the personal vehicle sharing of the vehicle does not exceed the annual expenses of owning and operating the vehicle, including depreciation, interest, lease payments, auto loan payments, insurance, maintenance, parking, fuel, cleaning, automobile repair, and costs associated with personal vehicle sharing, including, but not limited to, the installation, operation, and maintenance of computer hardware and software, signage identifying the vehicle as a personal sharing vehicle, and any fees charged by a personal vehicle sharing program.

(3) The owner of the private passenger motor vehicle does not knowingly place the vehicle into commercial use, as defined by Section 675.5, by a personal vehicle sharing user while engaged in personal vehicle sharing.

(b) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Personal vehicle sharing” means the use of private passenger motor vehicles by persons other than the vehicle’s owner, in connection with a personal vehicle sharing program.

(2) “Personal vehicle sharing program” means a legal entity qualified to do business in the State of California engaged in the business of facilitating the sharing of private passenger vehicles for noncommercial use by individuals within the state.

(3) “Private passenger motor vehicle” means a vehicle that is insured, or is subject to being insured, under a personal automobile liability insurance policy insuring a single individual or individuals residing in the same household,
 as the named insured, or meets the requirements of Section 16058 of the Vehicle Code, but does not include a vehicle with fewer than four wheels.

(c) A personal vehicle sharing program shall, for each vehicle that it facilitates the use of, do all of the following:

(1) Provide the registered owner of the vehicle with a Department of Motor Vehicles Form REG 5085 or other suitable proof of compliance with the insurance requirements of this section and the requirements of the California Financial Responsibility Law in Section 1656.2 of the Vehicle Code, a copy of which shall be maintained in the vehicle by the vehicle’s registered owner during any time when the vehicle is operated by any person other than the vehicle’s owner pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program.

(2) Collect, maintain, and make available to the vehicle’s owner, the vehicle owner’s primary automobile liability insurer on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles, and to any other government agency as required by law, at the cost of the personal vehicle sharing program, verifiable electronic records that identify the date, time, initial and final locations of the vehicle, and miles driven when the vehicle is under the control of a person other than the vehicle’s owner pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program.

(3) Not knowingly permit the vehicle to be operated for commercial use by a personal vehicle sharing user while engaged in personal vehicle sharing.

(4) Use only private passenger vehicles.

(5) Facilitate the installation, operation, and maintenance of computer hardware and software and signage, necessary for a vehicle to be used in a personal vehicle sharing program, including payment of the cost of damage or theft of that equipment and any damage caused to the vehicle by the installation, operation, and maintenance of that equipment.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law or any provision in a private passenger motor vehicle owner’s automobile insurance policy, in the event of a loss or injury that occurs during any time period when the vehicle is under the operation and control of a person, other than the vehicle owner, pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program, or otherwise under the control of a personal vehicle sharing program, the personal vehicle sharing program
 shall assume all liability of the owner and shall be considered the owner of the vehicle for all purposes. Nothing in this section limits the liability of the personal vehicle sharing program for its acts or omissions that result in injury to any persons as a result of the use or operation of a personal vehicle sharing program.

(e) A personal vehicle sharing program shall continue to be liable pursuant to subdivision (d) until both of the following occur:

(1) The private passenger motor vehicle is returned to a location designated by the personal vehicle sharing program.

(2) The earliest of one of the following occurs:

(A) The expiration of the time period
 established for the particular use of the vehicle.

(B) The intent to terminate the personal vehicle sharing use is verifiably communicated to the personal vehicle sharing program.

(C) The vehicle’s owner takes possession and control of the vehicle.

(f) The personal vehicle sharing program shall assume liability for a claim in which a dispute exists as to who was in control of the vehicle when the loss occurred giving rise to the claim, and the vehicle’s private passenger motor vehicle insurer shall indemnify the personal vehicle sharing program to the extent of its obligation under the applicable insurance policy, if it is determined that the vehicle’s owner was in control of the vehicle at the time of the
 loss.

(g) If the owner of the vehicle is named as a defendant in a civil action for a loss or injury that occurs during any time period when the vehicle is under the operation and control of a person other than the vehicle’s owner pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program, or otherwise under the control of a personal vehicle sharing program, the personal vehicle sharing program shall have the duty to defend and indemnify the vehicle’s owner, subject to the provisions of subdivisions (d) and (f).

(h) Notwithstanding any other law or any provision in a vehicle owner’s automobile liability insurance policy, while a private passenger motor vehicle is used by a person other than its owner pursuant to personal vehicle sharing facilitated through a personal vehicle sharing
 program, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The insurer of that vehicle on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles may exclude any and all coverage afforded pursuant to its policy.

(2) The primary and excess insurer or insurers of the owners, operators, and maintainers of the private passenger motor vehicle used in a personal vehicle sharing program shall have the right to notify an insured that it has no duty to defend or indemnify any person or organization for liability for any loss that occurs during use of the vehicle in a personal vehicle sharing program.

(i) A policy of insurance that is subject to Section 11580.1 or 11580.2 shall not be canceled, voided, terminated, rescinded, or nonrenewed solely on the basis
 that the private passenger motor vehicle has been made available for personal vehicle sharing pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program that is in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   (AB 2743)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.241.

(a) A personal vehicle sharing program shall, for each vehicle that it facilitates the use of, do all of the following:

(1) Provide both of the following during all times that the vehicle is engaged in personal vehicle sharing:

(A) (i) Insurance coverages for the vehicle and operator at a minimum of forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) for bodily injury or death for one person, ninety thousand dollars ($90,000) for bodily injury or death for all persons, and fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for property damage.

(ii) On
 and after January 1, 2031, the personal vehicle sharing program shall not provide liability coverage less than three times the minimum insurance requirements for private passenger vehicles set forth in Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code.

(B) The ability for the vehicle owner and operator to obtain or purchase additional insurance in excess of the minimum mandatory coverage and limits pursuant to subparagraph (A), including comprehensive and collision coverages or contractual protections.

(2) Provide the vehicle owner and any person that operates the vehicle pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program with a written
 disclosure of all of the following:

(A) The terms and conditions contained in this section, including any applicable insurance requirements, coverages, coverage gaps, protections, limits, and exclusions.

(B) The minimum mandatory coverage and limits that the personal vehicle sharing program is required to provide to owners and operators pursuant to Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code.

(C) The coverages and limits provided by the personal vehicle sharing program.

(D) The requirement that the personal vehicle sharing program provide the vehicle owner and any person that operates the vehicle pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program with the option to purchase or
 obtain additional limits, coverages, or protections.

(3) Disclose all of the following in writing to the vehicle owner:

(A) That the vehicle owner may have chosen higher limits, different coverages, or both, on their personal automobile insurance policy than those being provided by the personal vehicle sharing program, and, if so, that they have the option to purchase or obtain higher limits or optional coverages or protections.

(B) That their personal automobile insurance may expressly exclude coverage for a vehicle while it is being operated pursuant to a personal vehicle sharing program in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 11580.24.

(C) That if their
 personal automobile insurer does not expressly exclude coverage for vehicle sharing, it may still deny coverage for an accident occurring during vehicle sharing if the annual revenue from the personal vehicle sharing program to the vehicle owner exceeds the vehicle owner’s annual expense of owning and operating the vehicle, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 11580.24.

(b) (1) A person who violates this section is liable to the state for a civil penalty, to be determined by the commissioner, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation or, if the violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(2) The duties and obligations imposed by this act are cumulative with any other
 duties or obligations imposed under any other law, and shall not be construed to relieve any party from a duty or obligation imposed under any other law.

(c) A penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) is appealable by means of any remedy provided by Section 12940 or by the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) (1) If the commissioner has reason to believe that a person has engaged or is engaging in this state in a violation of this section, and that a proceeding by the commissioner would be in the interest of the public, the commissioner shall issue and serve upon that person an order to show cause. The order to show cause shall contain a statement of the charges,
 a statement of that person’s potential liability under this section, and a notice of a hearing. The hearing shall be held at a time and place fixed in the notice, which shall not be less than 30 days after the service of the notice, for the purpose of determining whether or not the commissioner shall issue an order to that person to pay the penalty imposed by subdivision (b) and to cease and desist those methods, acts, or practices that violate this section.

(2) If the charges noticed pursuant to paragraph (1) are confirmed by a preponderance of the evidence, the commissioner shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring that person to pay the penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) and to cease and desist from engaging in those methods, acts, or practices found to be in violation of this section.

(3) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that the hearings may be conducted by an administrative law judge in the administrative law bureau of the department when the proceedings involve a common question of law or fact with another proceeding arising under this code that may be conducted by the administrative law bureau’s administrative law judges. The commissioner and the appointed administrative law judge shall have all the powers granted under the Administrative Procedure Act.

(4) The person shall be entitled to have the proceedings and the order reviewed by means of any remedy provided by Section 12940 or by the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 244, Sec. 2.   (AB 2743)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.25.

No motor vehicle insured pursuant to a policy of insurance issued under Section 11580.1 or 11580.2 shall be classified as a common carrier, livery, or for-hire vehicle solely for the reason that the named insured is performing volunteer services for a nonprofit charitable organization or governmental agency consisting of providing social service transportation as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11580.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1320, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.26.

(a) Except where a named insured has agreed pursuant to Section 11580.2 to delete the coverages provided by that section, no policy of bodily injury liability insurance covering liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of any motor vehicle, except where the policy provides insurance in the Republic of Mexico issued or delivered in this state by nonadmitted Mexican insurers, and except a policy insuring a commercial vehicle as defined in Section 260 of the Vehicle Code, shall be issued or delivered in this state to the owner or operator of a motor vehicle, or shall be issued or delivered by any insurer licensed in this state upon any motor vehicle then principally used or principally garaged in this state, unless a named insured has been offered the following coverage:

(1) Where the policy of motor vehicle liability insurance includes collision coverage as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 660, coverage which provides that the deductible amount, if any, to be paid by the named insured under the collision coverage shall be payable by the insurer in the event of collision involving a vehicle owned by the named insured and insured under the policy, and an uninsured motor vehicle.

(2) Where the policy of motor vehicle liability insurance does not include collision coverage as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 660, coverage for property damage to the insured motor vehicle, but not including personal property contained therein, caused by the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle. As used in this subdivision, “property damage” means payment for loss or damage to the insured motor vehicle resulting from collision, not to exceed its actual cash value or three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500), whichever is less, for which loss or damage the insured is legally entitled to recover from the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle. Property damage does not include compensation for loss of use of the motor vehicle. As used in this subdivision, the term “insured motor vehicle” means the motor vehicle described in the underlying insurance policy of which the uninsured motorist property damage coverage or endorsement applies.

(b) Every payment by an insurer under either coverage provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall be payable under the terms and conditions set forth in the policy, and shall be made only where the collision involves actual, direct physical contact between the insured and the uninsured motor vehicle and the owner or operator of the uninsured motor vehicle is identified or the uninsured motor vehicle is identified by its license number, provided that the insured or someone on his or her behalf shall have reported the accident within 10 business days to his or her insurer or their agent and, provided further, that it is also determined by the insured and insurer or, in the event of disagreement, by arbitration conducted by a single neutral arbitrator, when the insured has formally instituted arbitration proceedings within one year from the date of the accident, that the insured is legally entitled to recover the amount of the payments for property damage from the owner or operator of the uninsured motor vehicle. No cause of action shall exist against either an insured or insurer from exercising the right to request arbitration of a claim under this section or Section 11580.2.

(c) Any named insured, prior to or subsequent to the issuance or renewal of a policy, may elect not to accept the type of coverage provided by this section or the insurer and any named insured may agree in writing to waive this coverage when a motor vehicle is used or operated by a person or persons designated by name. That election shall be binding upon every insured to whom the policy or endorsement provisions apply while the policy is in force and shall continue to be so binding, with respect to any continuation or renewal of the policy, or with respect to any other policy which extends, changes, supersedes, or replaces the policy issued to the named insured by the same insurer or with respect to reinstatement of the policy within 30 days of any lapse thereof. A policy shall be excluded from the application of this section if the only coverage, with respect to the use of any motor vehicle, is limited to the contingent liability arising out of the use of nonowned motor vehicles or if the automobile liability coverage is provided only on an excess or umbrella basis.

(d) An insurer paying a claim under any coverage required by this section shall be entitled to be subrogated to the rights of the insured to whom the claim was paid against any person legally liable for the damage to the insured motor vehicle to the extent that payment was made. The action may be brought within three years from the date that payment was made pursuant to this section.

In the event of a covered loss to a vehicle that is insured for the coverage described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and also insured for collision coverage, the collision coverage shall pay for the covered loss and the insurance described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall only pay any deductible not covered by the collision coverage not to exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

(e) As used in this section, “uninsured motor vehicle” means any motor vehicle with respect to the ownership, maintenance, or use of which there is no property damage liability insurance or bond applicable at the time of the accident, or there is applicable insurance or bond but the company writing the insurance or bond denies coverage thereunder or refuses to admit coverage thereunder, except conditionally or with reservation, or a motor vehicle used without the permission of the owner thereof if there is no property damage liability insurance or bond applicable at the time of the accident with respect to the owner or operator thereof. A motor vehicle which has at least the minimum property damage liability limits required pursuant to Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code shall not be held to be an uninsured motor vehicle even when the property damage liability limits are not sufficient to compensate for all property damage caused by the owner or operator of the vehicle. As used in this section, “uninsured motor vehicle” shall not include a motor vehicle owned or operated by any insured or any resident of the named insured’s household or self-insured within the meaning of the financial responsibility provisions of the state in which the motor vehicle is registered or which is owned by the United States of America, Canada, a state or political subdivision of any government, or an agency of any of the foregoing, or a land motor vehicle or trailer operated on rails or crawler treads or while located for use as a residence for premises and not as a vehicle, or a farm-type tractor or equipment designed for use principally off public roads, except while actually upon public roads. As used in this section, “uninsured motor vehicle” also means an insured motor vehicle where the liability insurer thereof is unable to make payment with respect to the legal liability of its insured within the limits specified therein because of insolvency. An insurer’s solvency protection shall be applicable only to accidents occurring during a policy period in which its insured’s motor vehicle coverage is in effect where the liability insurer of the tortfeasor becomes insolvent within one year of the accident. In the event of payment to any person under the coverage required by this section and subject to the terms and conditions of the coverage, the insurer making the payment shall, to the extent thereof, be entitled to any proceeds which may be recoverable from the assets of the insolvent insurer through any settlement or judgment of the person against the insolvent insurer.

(f) The offer of coverage required by this section shall be made only for policies issued or renewed on or after July 1, 1984.

(g) Any insurer whose insured has made a claim under either coverage provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), and that claim is pending, shall, at least 30 days before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitation, notify its insured in writing of the statute of limitation applicable to the property damage. Failure of the insurer to provide the written notice shall operate to toll any applicable statute of limitation until 30 days after the date the written notice is actually given. The notice shall not be required if the insurer has received notice that the insured is represented by an attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1471, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.27.

(a) For purposes of insurance, a motor vehicle insured pursuant to a policy of insurance issued under Section 11580.1 or 11580.2 shall not be classified as a common carrier, commercial vehicle, for-hire vehicle, permissive use vehicle, or livery solely for the reason that the named
 insured is operating or using the insured motor vehicle to provide public social services, as defined in Section 10051 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or social service transportation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11580.1.

(b) This section does not impair, affect, or change the rights, duties, or obligations of the employer of the named insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   (AB 815)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.3.

When an insured entitled to recovery under uninsured motorists’ coverage is a minor, an arbitration award upon the minor’s claim is deemed to be a compromise and is governed by Part 8 (commencing with Section 3300) of Division 4 of the Probate Code; provided, however, that the court may disapprove the award only on the grounds specified in Section 1286.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 113, Sec. 12.   Effective May 25, 1988.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.4.

In any action or arbitration proceeding to determine whether an insured shall be entitled to recovery of damages under uninsured motorist coverage, the certificate of the Department of Motor Vehicles that the owner or operator of the motor vehicle alleged to have been an uninsured motor vehicle at the time of the accident has not established financial responsibility, as provided in Section 16020 of the Vehicle Code, shall be admissible in evidence to create a rebuttable presumption that such vehicle was an uninsured motor vehicle at the time of the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.5.

No award made in an arbitration proceeding instituted pursuant to Section 11580.2 shall be deemed to be res judicata or collateral estoppel in any court action which may be pending or brought by the insured against the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1654.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.6.

Where a policy of liability insurance covering the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle or aircraft contains a provision indicating that coverage is extended to accidents, occurrences, and loss arising in Mexico, the policy shall contain an additional provision, either on the face of the policy or by an endorsement attached thereto stating as follows:
WARNING

Unless you have automobile or aircraft insurance written by a Mexican insurance company, you may spend many hours or days in jail, if you have an accident in Mexico. Insurance coverage should be secured from a company licensed under the laws of Mexico to write such insurance in order to avoid complications and some other penalties possible under the laws of Mexico, including the possible impoundment of your automobile or aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 511.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.8.

The Legislature declares it to be the public policy of this state to avoid so far as possible conflicts and litigation, with resulting court congestion, between and among injured parties, insureds, and insurers concerning which, among various policies of liability insurance and the various coverages therein, are responsible as primary, excess, or sole coverage, and to what extent, under the circumstances of any given event involving death or injury to persons or property caused by the operation or use of a motor vehicle.

The Legislature further declares it to be the public policy of this state that Section 11580.9 of the Insurance Code expresses the total public policy of this state respecting the order in which two or more of such liability insurance policies covering the same loss shall apply, and such public policy is not to be changed or modified by any provision of the Vehicle Code except in those express cases where the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 16450) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 of the Vehicle Code apply with regard to a policy of liability insurance certified as provided in Section 16431 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 300.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.9.

(a) Where two or more policies affording valid and collectible automobile liability insurance apply to the same motor vehicle in an occurrence out of which a liability loss shall arise, and one policy affords coverage to a named insured engaged in the business of selling, repairing, servicing, delivering, testing, road-testing, parking, or storing motor vehicles, then both of the following shall be conclusively presumed:

(1) If, at the time of loss, the motor vehicle is being operated by any person engaged in any of these businesses, or by his or her employee or agent, the insurance afforded by the policy issued to the person engaged in the business shall be primary, and the insurance afforded by any other policy shall be excess.

(2) If, at the time of loss, the motor vehicle is being operated by any person other than as described in paragraph (1), the insurance afforded by the policy issued to any person engaged in any of these businesses shall be excess over all other insurance available to the operator as a named insured or otherwise.

(b) Where two or more policies apply to the same loss, and one policy affords coverage to a named insured who in the course of his or her business rents or leases motor vehicles without operators, it shall be conclusively presumed that the insurance afforded by that policy to a person other than the named insured or his or her agent or employee, shall be excess over and not concurrent with, any other valid and collectible insurance applicable to the same loss covering the person as a named insured or as an additional insured under a policy with limits at least equal to the financial responsibility requirements specified in Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code. The presumption provided by this subdivision shall apply only if, at the time of the loss, the involved motor vehicle either:

(1) Qualifies as a “commercial vehicle.” For purposes of this subdivision, “commercial vehicle” means a type of vehicle subject to registration or identification under the laws of this state and is one of the following:

(A) Used or maintained for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or profit.

(B) Designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.

(2) Has been leased for a term of six months or longer.

(c) Where two or more policies are applicable to the same loss arising out of the loading or unloading of a motor vehicle, and one or more of the policies is issued to the owner, tenant, or lessee of the premises on which the loading or unloading occurs, it shall be conclusively presumed that the insurance afforded by the policy covering the motor vehicle shall not be primary, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in any endorsement required by law to be placed on the policy, but shall be excess over all other valid and collectible insurance applicable to the same loss with limits up to the financial responsibility requirements specified in Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code. In that event, the two or more policies shall not be construed as providing concurrent coverage, and only the insurance afforded by the policy or policies covering the premises on which the loading or unloading occurs shall be primary and the policy or policies shall cover as an additional insured with respect to the loading or unloading operations all employees of the owner, tenant, or lessee while acting in the course and scope of their employment.

(d) Except as provided in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), where two or more policies affording valid and collectible liability insurance apply to the same motor vehicle or vehicles in an occurrence out of which a liability loss shall arise, it shall be conclusively presumed that the insurance afforded by that policy in which the motor vehicle is described or rated as an owned automobile shall be primary and the insurance afforded by any other policy or policies shall be excess.

(e) Any insurance policy which, under the terms of subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, applies as excess coverage may provide with respect to any primary policy or to any loss to which primary insurance is not valid and collectible in whole or in part, that the excess policy shall apply only to the extent necessary to provide the insured with the coverage limits specified in Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code.

(f) The presumptions stated in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, may be modified or amended only by written agreement signed by all insurers who have issued a policy or policies applicable to a loss described in these subdivisions and all named insureds under these policies.

(g) Where two or more personal policies affording valid and collectible liability insurance apply to the same motor vehicle in an occurrence out of which a loss shall arise, and one policy, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 660, is primary, either by its terms or by operation of law, and one or more of the personal policies providing liability insurance, as defined in Section 108, are excess, either by their terms or by operation of law, then the following shall apply:

(1) Each insurer shall pay its share of the defense costs. Each insurer’s share of the defense costs shall be the percentage of the total defense costs equal to the amount of damage paid by that insurer as a percentage of total damages paid by all insurers whose policies apply to that motor vehicle.

(2) The term “defense costs” means, for purposes of this subdivision, reasonable attorney’s fees and expenses, investigation expenses, expert witness fees, and costs allowable under Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), when two or more policies affording valid and collectible automobile liability insurance apply to a power unit and an attached trailer or trailers in an occurrence out of which a liability loss shall arise, and one policy affords coverage to a named insured in the business of a trucker, defined as any person or organization engaged in the business of transporting property by auto for hire, then the following shall be conclusively presumed: If at the time of loss, the power unit is being operated by any person in the business of a trucker, the insurance afforded by the policy to the person engaged in the business of a trucker shall be primary for both power unit and trailer or trailers, and the insurance afforded by the other policy shall be excess.

(i) For purposes of this article, a certificate of self-insurance issued pursuant to Section 16053 of the Vehicle Code or a deposit of cash made pursuant to Section 16054.2 of the Vehicle Code or a bond in effect pursuant to Section 16054 of the Vehicle Code or a report of governmental ownership or lease filed pursuant to Section 16051 of the Vehicle Code shall be considered a policy of automobile liability insurance. However, this subdivision does not establish or provide the basis for any other form of liability for or upon a self-insurer or other person or entity holding, issuing, or establishing any form of security as described herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.10.

Any liability insurer issuing or renewing an automobile liability policy or a motor vehicle liability policy within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 16054 of the Vehicle Code shall provide written notice to the named insured of the policy identification number that may be used for verifying financial responsibility for purposes of Section 16028 of the Vehicle Code. This notice may be provided in a written binder, if any, or in the policy documents provided upon issuance or renewal of the policy. The insurer shall provide at least two copies of the notice to the insured and shall, upon request and payment of the reasonable cost thereof, provide additional copies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1124, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

11581.

Upon any proceeding supplementary to execution, such judgment debtor may be required to exhibit any policy carried by him, insuring him against the liability for the loss or damage for which judgment was obtained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11582.

No settlement made under a motor vehicle liability insurance policy of a claim against any insured thereunder arising from any accident or other event insured against for damage to or destruction of property owned by another person shall be construed as an admission of liability by the insured, or the insurer’s recognition of such liability, with respect to any other claim arising from the same accident or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 296.)
-------------------------------------------

11583.

No advance payment or partial payment of damages made by any person, or made by his insurer under liability insurance as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 108, as an accommodation to an injured person or on his behalf to others or to the heirs at law or dependents of a deceased person because of an injury or death claim or potential claim against any person or insured shall be construed as an admission of liability by the person claimed against, or of that person’s or the insurer’s recognition of such liability, with respect to such injured or deceased person or with respect to any other claim arising from the same accident or event. Any such payments shall, however, constitute a credit and be deductible from any final settlement made or judgment rendered with respect to such injured or deceased person which does not expressly take into account such advance payments. Any person, including any insurer, who makes such an advance or partial payment, shall at the time of beginning payment, notify the recipient thereof in writing of the statute of limitations applicable to the cause of action which such recipient may bring against such person as a result of such injury or death, including any time limitations within which claims are required to be made against the state or any local public entity when such payments are made on behalf of such public entities. Failure to provide such written notice shall operate to toll any such applicable statute of limitations or time limitations from the time of such advance or partial payment until such written notice is actually given. That notification shall not be required if the recipient is represented by an attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 792, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11584.

No policy of insurance issued or delivered in this state covering any loss, expense or liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of an aircraft shall exclude or deny coverage because the aircraft is operated in violation of federal or civil air regulations, or any state law or local ordinance, nor shall any policy exclude or deny coverage which the insured is obligated to provide according to law.

This section does not prohibit the use of specific exclusions or conditions in any such policy which relates to any of the following:

(1) Certification of an aircraft in a stated category by the Federal Aviation Administration.

(2) Certification of a pilot in a stated category by the Federal Aviation Administration.

(3) Establishing requirements for pilot experience.
